Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 8
SERVICE BENEFITS

28-3-801. Disability and death benefits.

A member of the military forces of the state of Colorado who dies or is disabled while in, or as a result of, active service on behalf of this state ordered by competent authority, which death or disability arises out of and in the course of his or her employment in the active service of the state of Colorado, is entitled to workers' compensation benefits in accordance with the provisions of the "Workers' Compensation Act of Colorado"; but no workers' compensation benefits shall be paid under this section in any case where similar benefits are payable under the provisions of any federal law or regulation.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 625, § 54.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-54.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-54.

L. 71:

p. 1046, § 6.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 571, § 59, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 601, § 53, effective May 24.

Cross references:

For the "Workers' Compensation Act of Colorado", see articles 40 to 47 of title 8.

28-3-802. Unit funds.

There is authorized to be created and maintained for each separate unit of the Colorado National Guard a unit fund. Expenditures from such unit fund shall be made in accordance with rules and regulations established by the adjutant general of the state of Colorado and applicable federal laws, rules, and regulations.

There is authorized to be deposited in each unit fund such moneys as may be received from gifts, bequests, contributions, including federal contributions, and such amounts as may be appropriated to such unit funds from the general fund of the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 625, § 55.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-55.

L. 71:

p. 1046, § 7.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 589, § 17, effective May 24.